New York, session 2025-2026, A7738.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The environmental conservation law is amended by adding a 2 new section 37-0123 to read as follows: 3 § 37-0123. Prohibition against the sale of perfluoroalkyl and polyfluo- 4 roalkyl substances in consumer and household products. 5 1. For purposes of this section, the following terms have the follow- 6 ing definitions: 7 (a) "Covered product" means textile articles, rugs, fabric treatments, 8 cookware, ski waxes, architectural paints, cleaning products, dental 9 floss, or a component thereof. 10 (b) "Regulated perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl substances" or 11 "regulated PFAS" means PFAS that are any of the following: 12 (i) an intentionally added chemical as defined in subdivision four of 13 section 37-0121 of this title; or EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00719-06-6 A. 7738--A 2 1 (ii) present in a product or product component at or above a level 2 that the department shall establish by regulation, as measured in total 3 organic fluorine, that is the lowest level that can feasibly be 4 achieved; provided, however, that the department shall review such level 5 at least every five years to determine whether it should be lowered. 6 (c) "Architectural paint" means interior and exterior architectural 7 coatings; provided, however, that "architectural paint" shall not 8 include industrial, original equipment or specialty coatings. 9 (d) "Cleaning product" means a finished product that is an air care 10 product, automotive product, general cleaning product, or a polish or 11 floor maintenance product used primarily for janitorial, domestic, or 12 institutional cleaning purposes. "Cleaning product" shall not mean any 13 of the following: 14 (i) foods, drugs, cosmetics and personal care products as defined in 15 section 37-0117 of this title; or 16 (ii) industrial products specifically manufactured for, and exclusive- 17 ly used in the following: oil and gas production; steel production; 18 heavy industry manufacturing; industrial water treatment; industrial 19 textile maintenance and processing other than industrial laundering; 20 food and beverage processing and packaging; or other industrial manufac- 21 turing processes. 22 (e) "Air care product" means a chemically formulated consumer product 23 labeled to indicate that the purpose of the product is to enhance or 24 condition the indoor environment by eliminating unpleasant odors or 25 freshening the air. 26 (f) "Automotive product" means a chemically formulated consumer prod- 27 uct labeled to indicate that the purpose of the product is to maintain 28 the appearance of a motor vehicle, as defined in section one hundred 29 twenty-five of the vehicle and traffic law, including products for wash- 30 ing, waxing, polishing, cleaning, or treating the exterior or interior 31 surfaces of motor vehicles. "Automotive product" does not include auto- 32 motive paint or paint repair products. 33 (g) "General cleaning product" means a soap, detergent, or other chem- 34 ically formulated consumer product labeled to indicate that the purpose 35 of the product is to clean, disinfect, or otherwise care for fabric, 36 dishes, or other wares; surfaces including, but not limited to, floors, 37 furniture, countertops, showers, and baths; or other hard surfaces, such 38 as stovetops, microwaves, and other appliances. 39 (h) "Polish or floor maintenance product" means a chemically formu- 40 lated consumer product, such as polish, wax, a stripper, or a restorer, 41 labeled to indicate that the purpose of the product is to polish, 42 protect, buff, condition, temporarily seal, strip, or maintain furni- 43 ture, floors, metal, leather, or other surfaces. 44 (i) "Cookware" refers to durable items used in homes, restaurants, 45 institutional settings, and commercial kitchens for preparing, dispens- 46 ing, or storing food, foodstuffs, or beverages. These items are designed 47 for indoor or outdoor use and include pots, pans, skillets, grills, 48 baking sheets, molds, trays, bowls, camping gear, and cooking utensils. 49 (j) "Fabric treatment" means a substance applied to a fabric for 50 stain, grease, or water resistance. 51 (k) "Manufacturer" means a person, firm, association, partnership or 52 corporation: 53 (i) that produces or manufactures a covered product or whose brand 54 name is affixed to the covered product; or 55 (ii) in the case of a covered product imported into the United States, 56 "manufacturer" means the importer or first domestic distributor of the A. 7738--A 3 1 product if the person that manufactured or assembled the covered product 2 or whose brand name is affixed to the product does not have a presence 3 in the United States. 4 (l) "Rugs" means any consumer products made from natural or synthetic 5 fabric intended to be used as a floor covering, other than carpets, and 6 includes handmade rugs, area rugs, or mats. 7 (m) "Ski wax" means a lubricant applied to the bottom of snow runners, 8 including skis and snowboards, to improve their grip and glide proper- 9 ties. 10 (n) "Textile" means any item made in whole or in part from a natural, 11 human-made, or synthetic fiber, yarn, or fabric. Textile includes, but 12 is not limited to, the following: leather, cotton, silk, jute, hemp, 13 wool, viscose, nylon, or polyester. "Textile" does not include single- 14 use paper hygiene products, including, but not limited to, toilet paper, 15 paper towels or tissues, or single-use absorbent hygiene products. For 16 the purposes of this subdivision, "single-use" means conventionally 17 disposed of after a single use or not sufficiently durable or washable 18 to be, or not intended to be, reusable or refillable. 19 (o) "Textile articles" means textile goods customarily used in house- 20 holds and businesses including, but not limited to, handbags, luggage, 21 backpacks, footwear, costumes and accessories, draperies, shower 22 curtains, furnishings, upholstery, beddings, towels, napkins, and table- 23 cloths. For the purposes of this section, "textile articles" does not 24 include (i) rugs; (ii) personal protective equipment, including for 25 medical purposes; or (iii) items covered by section 37-0121 of this 26 article. 27 (p) "Dental floss" means a thread, cord, string or similar material 28 that is used for cleaning between teeth. Dental floss includes floss 29 picks and other flossing tools. 30 2. (a) No person shall sell or offer for sale in the state any covered 31 product that contains regulated perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl 32 substances pursuant to subparagraph (i) of paragraph (b) of subdivision 33 one of this section. 34 (b) Commencing on January first, two thousand twenty-eight, no person 35 shall sell or offer for sale in the state any covered product that 36 contains regulated perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl substances pursu- 37 ant to subparagraph (ii) of paragraph (b) of subdivision one of this 38 section. 39 (c) The prohibition, sale or offer of sale under this section does not 40 apply to the sale or resale of used products. 41 3. (a) A manufacturer of a covered product sold into the state shall 42 provide persons that offer the product for sale in the state with a 43 certificate of compliance. The certificate of compliance shall provide 44 assurance, at a minimum, that the product does not contain any regulated 45 PFAS. Any certificate of compliance provided under this paragraph shall 46 be signed by an authorized official of the manufacturer. 47 (b) In addition to any other applicable penalties, it shall be a 48 violation of this section to provide a certificate of compliance under 49 paragraph (a) of this subdivision when a product is knowingly in 50 violation of the requirements of this section. 51 4. If the department has reason to believe that a covered product 52 contains regulated perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl substances and is 53 being sold or offered for sale in violation of this section, the 54 manufacturer of the covered product within thirty days shall: A. 7738--A 4 1 (a) provide the department with independent, third-party laboratory 2 test results demonstrating that the covered product does not contain 3 regulated PFAS; or 4 (b) notify persons who sell that covered product in this state that 5 the sale of that covered product is prohibited in this state and provide 6 the department with a list of the names and addresses of those notified. 7 5. A retailer of a product, who is not also the manufacturer of the 8 product, shall not be held in violation of this section if it can show 9 that such retailer relied in good faith on the certificate of compliance 10 provided for in paragraph (a) of subdivision three of this section. 11 § 2. Section 71-3703 of the environmental conservation law is amended 12 by adding a new subdivision 8 to read as follows: 13 8. Any person who violates any of the provisions of, or who fails to 14 perform any duty imposed by section 37-0123 of this chapter or any rule 15 or regulation promulgated pursuant thereto, shall be liable for a civil 16 penalty not to exceed one thousand dollars for each day, and in addition 17 thereto, such person may be enjoined from continuing such violation. 18 Such person shall for a second violation be liable to the people of the 19 state for a civil penalty not to exceed two thousand five hundred 20 dollars. 21 § 3. Subparagraphs (lx), (lxi), (lxii), (lxiii), (lxiv), (lxv), 22 (lxvi), (lxvii), (lxviii), (lxix), (lxx), (lxxi), (lxxii), (lxxiii), 23 (lxxiv), (lxxv), (lxxvi) and (lxxvii) of paragraph (b) of subdivision 1 24 of section 37-0905 of the environmental conservation law, as added by 25 section 1 of subpart AA of part XX of chapter 55 of the laws of 2020, 26 are amended to read as follows: 27 (lx) [Perfluorooctanoic acid (PFOA & related substances) (CAS 28 335-67-1)] Perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl substances as defined in 29 section 37-0101 of this article 30 (lxi) [Perfluorooctanyl sulphonic acid and its salts (PFOS) (CAS 31 1763-23-1) 32 (lxii)] Phenol (CAS 108-95-2) 33 [(lxiii)] (lxii) Phenol, 4-octyl- (CAS 1806-26-4) 34 [(lxiv)] (lxiii) P-hydroxybenzoic acid (CAS 99-96-7) 35 [(lxv)] (lxiv) Propyl paraben (CAS 94-13-3) 36 [(lxvi)] (lxv) Styrene (CAS 100-42-5) 37 [(lxvii)] (lxvi) Tetrabromobisphenol A (CAS 79-94-7) 38 [(lxviii)] (lxvii) Tetrachloroethene (CAS 127-18-4) 39 [(lxix)] (lxviii) Toluene (CAS 108-88-3) 40 [(lxx)] (lxix) Tricresyl phosphate (TCP) (CAS 1330-78-5) 41 [(lxxi)] (lxx) Tri-n-butyl phosphate (TNBP) (CAS 126-73-8) 42 [(lxxii)] (lxxi) Triphenyl phosphate (TPP) (CAS 115-86-6) 43 [(lxxiii)] (lxxii) Tris(1-chloro-2-propyl) phosphate (TCPP) (CAS 44 13674-84-5) 45 [(lxxiv)] (lxxiii) Tris(2-chloroethyl) phosphate (CAS 115-96-8) 46 [(lxxv)] (lxxiv) Tris(2,3-dibromopropylphosphate) (CAS 126-72-7) 47 [(lxxvi)] (lxxv) Vinyl chloride (CAS 75-01-4) 48 [(lxxvii)] (lxxvi) Organohalogen flame retardants 49 § 4. Paragraph (a) of subdivision 2 of section 37-0905 of the environ- 50 mental conservation law is amended by adding a new subparagraph (viii) 51 to read as follows: 52 (viii) Perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl substances 53 § 5. This act shall take effect January 1, 2028. Effective immediate- 54 ly, the addition, amendment and/or repeal of any rule or regulation 55 necessary for the implementation of this act on its effective date are 56 authorized to be made and completed on or before such effective date.